Louisiana, session 2026, SB353.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3351(H) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3351. General powers, duties, and functions of postsecondary education
management boards
* * *
H. In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by this Section,
each board may make student identification cards, within their respective
system, available as a digitized credential as authorized by Subpart E of Part
I of Chapter 1 of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, commonly
referred to as "LA Wallet". Student identification cards authorized by the
provisions of this Subsection shall be obtained by a student at no charge. A
biometric identification platform shall not charge any fee or payment for its use
to any student, university, retail establishment, partnership, corporation, or any
business.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.